Utah statutes.
62A-14-108.   Office volunteers.

(1)  A person who desires to be an office volunteer shall:

(a)  possess demonstrated personal characteristics of honesty, integrity, compassion, and concern for incapacitated persons; and

(b)  upon request, submit information for a background check pursuant to Section 62A-1-118.

(2)  An office volunteer may not receive compensation or benefits, but may be reimbursed by the office for expenses actually and reasonably incurred, consistent with Title 67, Chapter 20, Volunteer Government Workers Act.

(3)  An office volunteer is immune from civil liability pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 8, Immunity for Persons Performing Voluntary Services.

